Illinois, session 104th, SB2725.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Industrial Hemp Act is amended by changing 5Section 20 as follows: 6    (505 ILCS 89/20)7    Sec. 20. Hemp products. 8    (a) Nothing in this Act shall alter the legality of hemp or 9hemp products that are presently legal to possess or own.10    (b) No hemp cannabinoid shall be bottled and sold for 11purchase in a package or container that contains caffeine, 12including, but not limited to, ready to drink beverages. For 13the purposes of this Section, "hemp cannabinoid" means a 14naturally occurring phytocannabinoid derived from the hemp 15plant that does not have an intoxicating effect on the mind and 16body, as determined by the Department by rule, including:17        (1) cannabidiol (CBD);18        (2) cannabichromene (CBC);19        (3) cannabicitran (CBT);20        (4) cannabicyclol (CBL);21        (5) cannabielsoin (CBE);22        (6) cannabigerol (CBG);23        (7) cannabidivarin (CBDV); or  SB2725- 2 -LRB104 16034 RLC 29296 b1        (8) cannabinol (CBN). 2(Source: P.A. 100-1091, eff. 8-26-18.)